Louisiana, session 2026, SB368.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1870.1 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1870.2 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1870.1. Enforcement; Pharmacy Benefit Manager Enforcement Fund; creation
A. The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this Section Subpart
with all of the powers and authority vested in him pursuant to this Title.
B. Any act or combination of acts prohibited by this Section Subpart shall
be considered an unfair method of competition and unfair practice or act in
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-245 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 368
accordance with the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S.
51:1401 et seq.
C.(1) The attorney general shall have independent authority to investigate,
enforce, and contract with outside counsel for purposes of enforcing violations of
this Section. Subpart. Upon a finding that a pharmacy benefit manager has violated
any provision of this Section, Subpart, the attorney general may seek restitution to
the state and treble damages under civil action, and shall be entitled to an award of
attorney fees.
(2)(a) The Pharmacy Benefit Manager Enforcement Fund, hereafter referred
to as the "fund", is created in the state treasury as a special fund. Any monies
collected pursuant to a violation of this Section Subpart or violation of any
provision of law regulating the practice of pharmacy benefit managers shall be
deposited into the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested by the state
treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund and interest earned
on the investment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(b) After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and prior to monies being placed in the state general fund, all monies received by the
state pursuant to a civil award granted or settlement under the provisions of this
Section Subpart shall be deposited into the fund and used for the following
purposes:
(i) Subject to legislative appropriation, monies in the fund shall be used first
to fund the commissioner of insurance and attorney general's expenditures necessary
to carry out the provisions of this Section. Subpart.
(ii) At the conclusion of each fiscal year, any unexpended monies shall be
returned to the policyholders in accordance with a program designed by the attorney
general and commissioner.
§1870.2. Prescription drug pricing transparency
A.(1) A pharmaceutical drug manufacturer shall notify the commissioner
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-245 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 368
and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health no later than thirty
days after any of the following occur:
(a) The wholesale acquisition drug cost of a brand name drug increases
by more than the percentage change from the preceding year in the prescription
drug component of the Consumer Price Index of the United States Department
of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics per pricing unit during any twelve-month
period.
(b) The wholesale acquisition drug cost of a generic or biosimilar drug
increases by more than the percentage change from the preceding year in the
prescription drug component of the Consumer Price Index of the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics per pricing unit during any
twelve-month period.
(c) A new drug is introduced for distribution in the state that has a
wholesale acquisition cost greater than the amount that causes the drug to be
considered a specialty drug under the Medicare Part D program.
(2) For any prescription drug reported pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the manufacturer shall report to the commissioner and secretary
the following information about the drug:
(a) An explanation of the increase, including whether it was in response
to any rebate, other incentive or inducement, including discounts, or formulary
requirement.
(b) The total cost of production and approximate cost of production per
pricing unit.
(c) Research and development costs of the drug including but not limited
to all of the following:
(i) Research and development costs that are paid with public funds.
(ii) After-tax research and development costs paid by the manufacturer.
(iii) Research and development costs paid by third parties.
(iv) Marketing and advertising costs for the drug, apportioned by
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-245 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 368
marketing activities that are directed to consumers, marketing activities that
are directed to prescribers, and the total cost of all marketing and advertising
that is directed primarily to Louisiana consumers and prescribers.
B. No later than thirty days after receipt of a notice provided for in
Subsection A of this Section, the commissioner and secretary shall jointly
request pricing component data per pricing unit for the prescription drug from
each reporting entity.
C. No later than sixty days from the date of receiving a request from the
commissioner and secretary, a reporting entity shall notify the commissioner
and secretary of pricing component data per pricing unit of the prescription
drug.
D. Each reporting entity that submits a notification or report pursuant
to this Section shall submit with the notification or report a signed written
certification of the notification's or report's accuracy.
E. The commissioner and secretary shall make the information provided
for in Subsections A and C of this Section publicly accessible on the website of
both the Department of Insurance and the Louisiana Department of Health.
F. The failure of any reporting entity to provide information required by
this Section shall be considered an unfair method of competition and unfair
practice or act in accordance with the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer
Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq. In addition to any enforcement actions
taken by the commissioner as authorized pursuant to this Title, the
commissioner and secretary shall refer any reporting entity that fails to provide
a notification or report required by this Section to the attorney general.
G. The Department of Insurance and the Louisiana Department of
Health may audit the data submitted by a reporting entity pursuant to this
Section. The reporting entity shall pay for the costs of the audit.
H. By January first of each year, the commissioner and secretary shall
produce a joint annual report and submit the report to the governor, the
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-245 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 368
president of the Senate, and the speaker of the House of Representatives. The
report shall include all of the following:
(1) Information developed from the disclosures received pursuant to this
Section on trends in the cost of prescription drugs, analysis of manufacturer
prices and price increases, the major components of prescription drug pricing
along the supply chain and the impacts on insurance premiums and cost
sharing, and any other information the commissioner and secretary determine
is relevant to providing greater consumer awareness of the factors contributing
to the cost of prescription drugs in the state.
(2) Information identifying the twenty-five costliest drugs in the state, the
twenty-five most frequently prescribed drugs in the state, and the twenty-five
drugs with the highest year-over-year cost increases.
I. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Affiliated manufacturer" means a drug or biological product
manufacturer that, either directly or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries:
(a) Has an investment or ownership interest in a pharmacy benefit
manager licensed by the commissioner.
(b) Shares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager
licensed by the commissioner.
(c) Has an investor or a holder of an ownership interest in a pharmacy
benefit manager licensed by the commissioner.
(2) "Prescription drug" or "drug" means a drug that is required by any
applicable federal or state law or regulation to be dispensed or delivered
pursuant only to a prescription drug order, or is restricted to use by
practitioners only and includes biological products. The term is limited to
prescription drugs and biological products intended for human use.
(3) "Reporting entity" means a manufacturer, affiliated manufacturer,
group purchasing organization, rebate aggregator, wholesale drug distributor,
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-245 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 368
pharmacy benefits manager, and any other entity in the supply chain between
the manufacturer and pharmacy.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health.
Section 2. R.S. 22:1870(B)(5) is hereby repealed.